District of Columbia statutes.
48-831.33

Discounted prices for uninsured qualified residents.

(a)

Any participating retail pharmacy that sells prescription drugs covered by a rebate agreement pursuant to § 48-831.05 shall discount the retail price of those drugs sold to uninsured qualified residents.

(b)

The Department shall establish discounted prices for drugs covered by a rebate agreement and shall promote the use of efficacious and reduced-cost drugs, taking into consideration reduced prices for state and federally capped drug programs, differential dispensing fees, administrative overhead, and incentive payments.

(c)

Beginning January 1, 2005, a participating retail pharmacy shall offer the initial discounted price.

(d)

Beginning no later than October 1, 2005, a participating retail pharmacy shall offer the secondary discounted price, if available.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 133, 51 DCR 3688
This section is referenced in § 48-831.06, § 48-831.07, and § 48-831.10.